Washington statutes.
RCW 36.110.150

Department of corrections to provide staff assistance.

Until sufficient funding is secured by the board to adequately provide staffing, basic staff assistance shall be provided, to the extent possible, by the department of corrections.

[ 1993 c 285 s 15.]